Hawaii statutes.
§425-159 Amending, restating, and amending
and restating the statement of foreign qualification; voluntary cancellation.
(a) A foreign limited liability partnership shall amend, restate, and amend
and restate the statement of qualification in the same manner prescribed for
domestic limited liability partnerships in section 425-154.

(b) A foreign limited liability partnership
validly elected under this chapter may voluntarily cancel its limited liability
status in an amendment to a statement of qualification. [L 2000, c 218, pt of
§1; am L 2001, c 241, §6; am L 2003, c 124, §54]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next